Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 2 Appellate Practice

Law reviews.

For article suggesting change in Georgia appellate procedure prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 15 Ga. B.J. 322 (1953).

For article advocating reform of appellate procedure prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 18 Ga. B.J. 415 (1956).

For article outlining proposed revisions of appellate procedure rules with comments, prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 19 Ga. B.J. 145 (1956).

For article, “A Discussion of the 1957 Amendments to Rules of Practice and Procedure in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. B.J. 395 (1957).

For article discussing results of legislative changes in appellate procedure, prior to the enactment of the Appellate Practice Act, see 20 Ga. B.J. 38 (1957).

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965” (this article), see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965” (this article), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For article, “The 1967 Amendments to the Georgia Civil Practice Act and the Appellate Procedure Act” (this article), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 383 (1967).

For article discussing problems in Georgia appellate procedure after the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act of 1965 (this article), see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 231 (1968).

For article discussing developments in Georgia appellate practice and procedure in 1976 to 1977 (this article), see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (1977).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 79 (1984).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

5-6-30.
Purpose of article; construction.

It is the intention of this article to provide a procedure for taking cases to the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, as authorized in Article VI, Sections V and VI of the Constitution of this state; to that end, this article shall be liberally construed so as to bring about a decision on the merits of every case appealed and to avoid dismissal of any case or refusal to consider any points raised therein, except as may be specifically referred to in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 23; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 47.

Law reviews.

For article, “Let’s Revise Appellate Procedure in Georgia,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 135 (1991).

For article, “Appeals, Interlocutory and Discretionary Applications, and Post-Judgment Motions in the Georgia Courts: The Current Practice and the Need for Reform Legislation,” see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1992).

For comment on Davis v. Davis,

222 Ga. 579

,

151 S.E.2d 123

(1966), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 259 (1967).

5-6-31.
Entry of judgment defined.

The filing with the clerk of a judgment, signed by the judge, constitutes the entry of a judgment within the meaning of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 18B.

Cross references.

Motions for rehearing, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 48.

Law reviews.

For article comparing sections of Ch. 11, T. 9 with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 295 (1967).

5-6-32.
Manner of service of notices and other papers upon parties; waiver or acknowledgment of service.

Whenever under this article service or the giving of any notice is required or permitted to be made upon a party and the party is represented by an attorney, the service shall be made upon the attorney unless service upon the party himself is ordered by the court. Service of all notices and other papers hereunder and service of motions for new trial, motions in arrest, motions for judgment notwithstanding the verdict, and all other similar motions, orders, and proceedings may be made by the attorney or party filing the notice or paper, in person or by mail, and proof thereof shown by acknowledgment of the attorney or party served, or by certificate of the attorney, party, or other person perfecting service. Service of any paper, motion, or notice may be perfected either before or after filing with the clerk thereof; and when service is made by mail it shall be deemed to be perfected as of the day deposited in the mail. Where the address of any party is unknown and the party is not represented by an attorney of record, service of all notices and other papers referred to above may be perfected on the party by mail directed to the last known address of the party.

Service of any notice, motion, or other paper provided for in this article may be waived or acknowledged either before or after filing.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 18; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 7; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 5.

Cross references.

Service of motion for supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Service where capital crime involved, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 44.

Preparation and filing of motions, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 32.

Notices of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 33.

Objections to records or transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 47.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For article, “Synopses of 1968 Amendments Appellate Procedure Act and Georgia Civil Practice Act,” see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 503 (1968).

5-6-33.
Right of appeal generally.

Either party in any civil case and the defendant in any criminal proceeding in the superior, state, or city courts, or in the Georgia State-wide Business Court, may appeal from any sentence, judgment, decision, or decree of the court, or of the judge thereof in any matter heard at chambers.

Either party in any civil case in the probate courts provided for by Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15 may appeal from any judgment, decision, or decree of the court, or of the judge thereof in any matter heard at chambers.

This Code section shall not affect Chapter 7 of this title.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4160; Code 1868, § 4192; Code 1873, § 4251; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 123, § 1; Code 1882, § 4251; Ga. L. 1887, p. 41, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 5527; Penal Code 1895, § 1070; Civil Code 1910, § 6139; Penal Code 1910, § 1097; Code 1933, § 6-901; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 22; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 5; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 2-2/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “, or in the Georgia State-wide Business Court,” in the middle of paragraph (a)(1).

Cross references.

Appeals in habeas corpus cases, §§

9-14-22

,

9-14-52

.

Review of death sentences by Supreme Court, §

17-10-35

et seq.

Appeal to Court of Appeals or Supreme Court from final judgment of superior court pertaining to review of final decision of administrative agency, §

50-13-20

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, a comma was deleted following “city courts” in paragraph (a)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

5-6-34.
Judgments and rulings deemed directly appealable; procedure for review of judgments, orders, or decisions not subject to direct appeal; scope of review; hearings in criminal cases involving a capital offense for which death penalty is sought; appeals involving nonmonetary judgments in child custody cases.

Appeals may be taken to the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals from the following judgments and rulings of the superior courts, the Georgia State-wide Business Court, the constitutional city courts, and such other courts or tribunals from which appeals are authorized by the Constitution and laws of this state:

All final judgments, that is to say, where the case is no longer pending in the court below, except as provided in Code Section 5-6-35;

All judgments involving applications for discharge in bail trover and contempt cases;

All judgments or orders directing that an accounting be had;

All judgments or orders granting or refusing applications for receivers or for interlocutory or final injunctions;

All judgments or orders granting or refusing applications for attachment against fraudulent debtors;

Any ruling on a motion which would be dispositive if granted with respect to a defense that the action is barred by Code Section 16-11-173;

All judgments or orders granting or refusing to grant mandamus or any other extraordinary remedy, except with respect to temporary restraining orders;

All judgments or orders refusing applications for dissolution of corporations created by the superior courts;

All judgments or orders sustaining motions to dismiss a caveat to the probate of a will;

All judgments or orders entered pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 17-10-6.2;

All judgments or orders in child custody cases awarding, refusing to change, or modifying child custody or holding or declining to hold persons in contempt of such child custody judgment or orders;

All judgments or orders entered pursuant to Code Section 35-3-37; and

All judgments or orders entered pursuant to Code Section 9-11-11.1.

Where the trial judge in rendering an order, decision, or judgment, not otherwise subject to direct appeal, including but not limited to the denial of a defendant’s motion to recuse in a criminal case, certifies within ten days of entry thereof that the order, decision, or judgment is of such importance to the case that immediate review should be had, the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals may thereupon, in their respective discretions, permit an appeal to be taken from the order, decision, or judgment if application is made thereto within ten days after such certificate is granted. The application shall be in the nature of a petition and shall set forth the need for such an appeal and the issue or issues involved therein. The applicant may, at his or her election, include copies of such parts of the record as he or she deems appropriate, but no certification of such copies by the clerk of the trial court shall be necessary. The application shall be filed with the clerk of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals and a copy of the application, together with a list of those parts of the record included with the application, shall be served upon the opposing party or parties in the case in the manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32, except that such service shall be perfected at or before the filing of the application. The opposing party or parties shall have ten days from the date on which the application is filed in which to file a response. The response may be accompanied by copies of the record in the same manner as is allowed with the application. The Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall issue an order granting or denying such an appeal within 45 days of the date on which the application was filed. Within ten days after an order is issued granting the appeal, the applicant, to secure a review of the issues, may file a notice of appeal as provided in Code Section 5-6-37. The notice of appeal shall act as a supersedeas as provided in Code Section 5-6-46 and the procedure thereafter shall be the same as in an appeal from a final judgment.

In criminal cases involving a capital offense for which the death penalty is sought, a hearing shall be held as provided in Code Section 17-10-35.2 to determine if there shall be a review of pretrial proceedings by the Supreme Court prior to a trial before a jury. Review of pretrial proceedings, if ordered by the trial court, shall be exclusively as provided by Code Section 17-10-35.1 and no certificate of immediate review shall be necessary.

Where an appeal is taken under any provision of subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this Code section, all judgments, rulings, or orders rendered in the case which are raised on appeal and which may affect the proceedings below shall be reviewed and determined by the appellate court, without regard to the appealability of the judgment, ruling, or order standing alone and without regard to whether the judgment, ruling, or order appealed from was final or was appealable by some other express provision of law contained in this Code section, or elsewhere. For purposes of review by the appellate court, one or more judgments, rulings, or orders by the trial court held to be erroneous on appeal shall not be deemed to have rendered all subsequent proceedings nugatory; but the appellate court shall in all cases review all judgments, rulings, or orders raised on appeal which may affect the proceedings below and which were rendered subsequent to the first judgment, ruling, or order held erroneous. Nothing in this subsection shall require the appellate court to pass upon questions which are rendered moot.

Where an appeal is taken pursuant to this Code section for a judgment or order granting nonmonetary relief in a child custody case, such judgment or order shall stand until reversed or modified by the reviewing court unless the trial court states otherwise in its judgment or order.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4159; Code 1868, § 4191; Code 1873, § 4250; Code 1882, § 4250; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 82, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 5526; Penal Code 1895, § 1069; Civil Code 1910, § 6138; Penal Code 1910, § 1096; Code 1933, § 6-701; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 757, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 619, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 599, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1437, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 88, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 20, § 2/HB 170; Ga. L. 2005, p. 224, § 2/HB 221; Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 2/HB 1059; Ga. L. 2006, p. 583, § 1/SB 382; Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 2/HB 369; Ga. L. 2011, p. 562, § 1/SB 139; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 8-1/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 735, § 1/SB 204; Ga. L. 2016, p. 341, § 1/HB 513; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 2-3/HB 239.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added subsection (e). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(10), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(11), and added paragraph (a)(12).

The 2013 amendment,

effective May 6, 2013, substituted “awarding, refusing to change, or modifying child custody” for “including, but not limited to, awarding or refusing to change child custody” in paragraph (a)(11).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(11); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(12); and added paragraph (a)(13).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “the Georgia State-wide Business Court,” in the middle of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Certification for immediate review of nonfinal judgments, §

5-7-2

.

Applicability of section to orders denying summary judgment, see §

9-11-56

.

Right of appeal by first offenders placed on probation, see §

42-8-64

.

Granting of application for leave to appeal interlocutory order, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 22.

Jurisdictional statement and copy of order and compliance with statutory duty to file notice of appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 24.

Leave to appeal interlocutory order, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 29.

Leave to appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 40.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “and” was added to the end of paragraph (a)(9), former paragraph (a)(10), which read: “Repealed; and” was deleted, and former paragraph (a)(11) was redesignated as present paragraph (a)(10).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “ Code Section 16-11-173” was substituted for “ Code Section 16-11-184” at the end of paragraph (a)(6).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 88, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply to any case pending on or brought after the effective date of this Act; and, for purposes of taking an appeal pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (5.1) of subsection (a) of
Code Section 5-6-34 as enacted by this Act, any ruling actually entered before the effective date of this Act in any case which is pending on the effective date of this Act shall be deemed to have been entered on the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of this Act was March 23, 2001.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 20, § 1/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Justice Act of 2005.’ ”

Ga. L. 2005, p. 20, § 17/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to all trials which commence on or after July 1, 2005.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 224, § 1/HB 221, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and declares that it is important to assess periodically child support guidelines and determine whether existing guidelines continue to be viable and effective or whether they have failed or ceased to accomplish their original policy objectives. The General Assembly further finds that supporting Georgia’s children is vitally important to the citizens of Georgia. Therefore, the General Assembly has determined that it is in the best interests of the state and its citizenry to undertake an evaluation of the child support guidelines on a continuing basis. The General Assembly declares that it is important that all of Georgia’s children are provided with adequate financial support whether the children’s parents are living together or not living together. The General Assembly finds that both parents have a continuing obligation with respect to providing financial and emotional stability for their child or children. It is the hope of the members of the General Assembly that all parents work together to advance the best interest of their children.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 1/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly finds and declares that recidivist sexual offenders, sexual offenders who use physical violence, and sexual offenders who prey on children are sexual predators who present an extreme threat to the public safety. Many sexual offenders are extremely likely to use physical violence and to repeat their offenses; and some sexual offenders commit many offenses, have many more victims than are ever reported, and are prosecuted for only a fraction of their crimes. The General Assembly finds that this makes the cost of sexual offender victimization to society at large, while incalculable, clearly exorbitant. The General Assembly further finds that the high level of threat that a sexual predator presents to the public safety, and the long-term effects suffered by victims of sex offenses, provide the state with sufficient justification to implement a strategy that includes:

“(1) Incarcerating sexual offenders and maintaining adequate facilities to ensure that decisions to release sexual predators into the community are not made on the basis of inadequate space;

“(2) Requiring the registration of sexual offenders, with a requirement that complete and accurate information be maintained and accessible for use by law enforcement authorities, communities, and the public;

“(3) Providing for community and public notification concerning the presence of sexual offenders;

“(4) Collecting data relative to sexual offenses and sexual offenders;

“(5) Requiring sexual predators who are released into the community to wear an electronic monitoring system for the rest of their natural life and to pay for such system; and

“(6) Prohibiting sexual predators from working with children, either for compensation or as a volunteer.

“The General Assembly further finds that the state has a compelling interest in protecting the public from sexual offenders and in protecting children from predatory sexual activity, and there is sufficient justification for requiring sexual offenders to register and for requiring community and public notification of the presence of sexual offenders. The General Assembly declares that in order to protect the public, it is necessary that the sexual offenders be registered and that members of the community and the public be notified of a sexual offender’s presence. The designation of a person as a sexual offender is neither a sentence nor a punishment but simply a regulatory mechanism and status resulting from the conviction of certain crimes. Likewise, the designation of a person as a sexual predator is neither a sentence nor a punishment but simply a regulatory mechanism and status resulting from findings by the Sexual Offender Registration Review Board and a court if requested by a sexual offender.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 379, § 30(c)/HB 1059, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect or abate the status as a crime of any such act or omission which occurred prior to the effective date of the Act repealing, repealing and reenacting, or amending such law, nor shall the prosecution of such crime be abated as a result of such repeal, repeal and reenactment, or amendment.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 583, § 8/SB 382, not codified by the General Assembly, amended Ga. L. 2005, p. 224, § 13, so as to delay the effective date of the 2005 amendment to subsection (a) of this Code section until January 1, 2007.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 583, § 9/SB 382, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intention of the 2006 Act to delay for six months the effectiveness of the provisions of 2005 Act No. 52 (Ga. L. 2005, p. 224) of the General Assembly, excepting only those provisions of 2005 Act No. 52 (Ga. L. 2005, p. 224) creating the Georgia Child Support Commission which went into effect upon approval of that Act by the Governor.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 583, § 10(b)/SB 382, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Sections 1 through 7 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2007, and shall apply to all pending civil actions on or after January 1, 2007.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 1/HB 369, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly of Georgia declares that it is the policy of this state to assure that minor children have frequent and continuing contact with parents who have shown the ability to act in the best interests of their children and to encourage parents to share in the rights and responsibilities of rearing their children after the parents have separated or dissolved their marriage or relationship.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 8/HB 369, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment applies to all child custody proceedings and modifications of child custody filed on or after January 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 562, § 4/SB 139, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall apply to all notices or applications for appeal filed on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the inefficiency of mandamus and impeachment as remedies for judicial inaction, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 467 (1969).

For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of trial practice and procedure from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 239 (1978).

For article surveying judicial developments in Georgia’s trial practice and procedure laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 249 (1979).

For article surveying developments in Georgia trial practice and procedure from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (1981).

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For article surveying recent developments in administrative law, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 503 (1985).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (1986).

For annual survey of trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (1988).

For article, “Intangible Tax Appeals After Blank v. Collins; The Uncertainty Continues,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 78 (1990).

For article, “Let’s Revise Appellate Procedure in Georgia,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 135 (1991).

For article, “Getting Certiorari Granted,” 28 Ga. St. B.J. 90 (1991).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1991).

For annual survey of domestic relations, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 243 (1991).

For article, “Appeals, Interlocutory and Discretionary Applications, and Post-Judgment Motions in the Georgia Courts: The Current Practice and the Need for Reform Legislation,” see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1992).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2004).

For annual survey of domestic relations law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 221 (2004).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 35 (2005).

For annual survey of domestic relations cases, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 173 (2005).

For article on 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 73 (2005).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 11, 103 (2006).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For survey article on domestic relations
law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 139 (2007).

For survey article on administrative law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2008).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2008).

For annual survey on appellate practice and procedure, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2009).

For annual survey on domestic relations, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (2009).

For annual survey of law on appellate practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 25 (2010).

For article, “Appellate Practice and Procedure,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 67 (2011).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 277 (2013).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 109 (2016).

For article, “Annual Survey of Georgia Law:
June 1, 2015 — May 31, 2016:
Special Contribution: Open Chambers Revisited: Demystifying the Inner Workings and Culture of the Georgia Court of Appeals,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2016).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

For annual survey on domestic relations, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2019).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 305 (2019).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).

For comment on Sayers v. Rothberg,

222 Ga. 626

,

151 S.E.2d 445

(1967), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 489 (1967).

For comment on Milholland v. Oglesby,

223 Ga. 230

,

154 S.E.2d 194

(1967), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 392 (1968).

5-6-35.
Cases requiring application for appeal; requirements for application; exhibits; response; issuance of appellate court order regarding appeal; procedure; supersedeas; jurisdiction of appeal; appeals involving nonmonetary judgments in custody cases.

Appeals in the following cases shall be taken as provided in this Code section:

Appeals from decisions of the superior courts reviewing decisions of the State Board of Workers’ Compensation, the State Board of Education, auditors, state and local administrative agencies, and lower courts by certiorari or de novo proceedings; provided, however, that this provision shall not apply to decisions of the Public Service Commission and probate courts and to cases involving ad valorem taxes and condemnations;

Appeals from judgments or orders in divorce, alimony, and other domestic relations cases including, but not limited to, granting or refusing a divorce or temporary or permanent alimony or holding or declining to hold persons in contempt of such alimony judgment or orders;

Appeals from cases involving distress or dispossessory warrants in which the only issue to be resolved is the amount of rent due and such amount is $2,500.00 or less;

Appeals from cases involving garnishment or attachment, except as provided in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 5-6-34;

Appeals from orders revoking probation;

(5.1)

Appeals from decisions of superior courts reviewing decisions of the Sexual Offender Registration Review Board;

(5.2)

Appeals from decisions of superior courts granting or denying petitions for release pursuant to Code Section 42-1-19;

Appeals in all actions for damages in which the judgment is $10,000.00 or less;

Appeals, when separate from an original appeal, from the denial of an extraordinary motion for new trial;

Appeals from orders under subsection (d) of Code Section 9-11-60 denying a motion to set aside a judgment or under subsection (e) of Code Section 9-11-60 denying relief upon a complaint in equity to set aside a judgment;

Appeals from orders granting or denying temporary restraining orders;

Appeals from awards of attorney’s fees or expenses of litigation under Code Section 9-15-14;

Appeals from decisions of the state courts reviewing decisions of the magistrate courts by de novo proceedings so long as the subject matter is not otherwise subject to a right of direct appeal; and

Appeals from orders terminating parental rights.

All appeals taken in cases specified in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be by application in the nature of a petition enumerating the errors to be urged on appeal and stating why the appellate court has jurisdiction. The application shall specify the order or judgment being appealed and, if the order or judgment is interlocutory, the application shall set forth, in addition to the enumeration of errors to be urged, the need for interlocutory appellate review.

The applicant shall include as exhibits to the petition a copy of the order or judgment being appealed and should include a copy of the petition or motion which led directly to the order or judgment being appealed and a copy of any responses to the petition or motion. An applicant may include copies of such other parts of the record or transcript as he deems appropriate. No certification of such copies by the clerk of the trial court shall be necessary in conjunction with the application.

The application shall be filed with the clerk of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals within 30 days of the entry of the order, decision, or judgment complained of and a copy of the application, together with a list of those parts of the record included with the application, shall be served upon the opposing party or parties as provided by law, except that the service shall be perfected at or before the filing of the application. When a motion for new trial, a motion in arrest of judgment, or a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict has been filed, the application shall be filed within 30 days after the entry of the order granting, overruling, or otherwise finally disposing of the motion.

The opposing party or parties shall have ten days from the date on which the application is filed in which to file a response. The response may be accompanied by copies of the record in the same manner as is allowed with the application. The response may point out that the decision of the trial court was not error, or that the enumeration of error cannot be considered on appeal for lack of a transcript of evidence or for other reasons.

The Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall issue an order granting or denying such an appeal within 30 days of the date on which the application was filed.

Within ten days after an order is issued granting the appeal, the applicant, to secure a review of the issues, shall file a notice of appeal as provided by law. The procedure thereafter shall be the same as in other appeals.

The filing of an application for appeal shall act as a supersedeas to the extent that a notice of appeal acts as supersedeas.

This Code section shall not affect Code Section 9-14-52, relating to practice as to appeals in certain habeas corpus cases.

When an appeal in a case enumerated in subsection (a) of Code Section 5-6-34, but not in subsection (a) of this Code section, is initiated by filing an otherwise timely application for permission to appeal pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section without also filing a timely notice of appeal, the appellate court shall have jurisdiction to decide the case and shall grant the application. Thereafter the appeal shall proceed as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section.

Where an appeal is taken pursuant to this Code section for a judgment or order granting nonmonetary relief in a child custody case, such judgment or order shall stand until reversed or modified by the reviewing court unless the trial court states otherwise in its judgment or order.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 619, §§ 3, 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 599, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1591, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1357, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 347, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 3/HB 369; Ga. L. 2010, p. 168, § 1/HB 571; Ga. L. 2011, p. 562, § 2/SB 139.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added subsection (k). See editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Petitions for alimony or child support when no divorce is pending, §§

19-6-10

,

19-6-11

.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Application for leave to appeal final judgment, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 25.

Leave to appeal interlocutory order, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 29.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “(a) of this Code section” was substituted for “(a) of this Code Section” in the first sentence of subsection (j).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1591, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act applies to actions filed or presented for filing on or after July 1, 1986, and to any action pending on July 1, 1986, with respect to any claim, defense, or other position which is first raised in the action on or after July 1, 1986.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 1/HB 369, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly of Georgia declares that it is the policy of this state to assure that minor children have frequent and continuing contact with parents who have shown the ability to act in the best interests of their children and to encourage parents to share in the rights and responsibilities of rearing their children after the parents have separated or dissolved their marriage or relationship.”

Ga. L. 2007, p. 554, § 8/HB 369, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment applies to all child custody proceedings and modifications of child custody filed on or after January 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 562, § 4/SB 132, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall apply to all notices or applications for appeal filed on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For survey article on domestic relations, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 113 (1982).

For annual survey of domestic relations law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 127 (1983).

For article surveying recent developments in administrative law, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 503 (1985).

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (1986).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 129 (1986).

For annual survey of law of domestic relations, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 179 (1986).

For article, “Battling the Many-Headed Hydra: Abusive Litigation Law in Georgia,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J. 65 (1988).

For article, “Intangible Tax Appeals After Blank v. Collins; The Uncertainty Continues,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 78 (1990).

For annual survey on law of domestic relations, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 201 (1990).

For article, “Let’s Revise Appellate Procedure in Georgia,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 135 (1991).

For article, “Getting Certiorari Granted”, 28 Ga. St. B.J. 90 (1991).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1991).

For annual survey of domestic relations, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 243 (1991).

For article, “Appeals, Interlocutory and Discretionary Applications, and Post-Judgment Motions in the Georgia Courts: The Current Practice and the Need for Reform Legislation,” see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1992).

For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).

For annual survey of domestic relations law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 221 (2004).

For annual survey of Administrative Law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2005).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 35 (2005).

For annual survey of domestic relations cases, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 173 (2005).

For annual survey of criminal law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2008).

For annual survey on domestic relations, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (2009).

For annual survey of law on appellate practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 25 (2010).

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2011).

For article, “Appellate Practice and Procedure,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 67 (2011).

For annual survey on domestic relations law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 121 (2012).

For annual survey on real property, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (2012).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

For article, “Division of Labor:
The Modernization of the Supreme Court of Georgia and Concomitant Workload Reduction Measures in the Court of Appeals,” see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 925 (2014).

For article, “Annual Survey of Georgia Law:
June 1, 2015 — May 31, 2016:
Special Contribution: Open Chambers Revisited: Demystifying the Inner Workings and Culture of the Georgia Court of Appeals,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2016).

For annual survey on administrative law, 68 Mercer L. Rev. 59 (2016).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

For annual survey on local government law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 177 (2018).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

For annual survey on domestic relations, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 83 (2019).

For annual survey on local government law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 189 (2019).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (2019).

For note, “Restrictions on the Right to Direct Appeal under Georgia’s Appellate Practice Act,” see 21 Ga. St. B.J. 43 (1984).